Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 3. Agriculture and Extension Work

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture § 25.

3 C.J.S. Agriculture § 60; 14A C.J.S. Colleges and Universities §§ 7, 8.

§ 21-17-301.
Supervision and management of farms and stations; director of experiments.

All the experiment farms and stations are under the supervision, management and control of the board of trustees of the University of Wyoming.

The board of trustees of the University of Wyoming may employ a director of experiments, who shall receive a salary fixed by the board and necessary traveling expenses, and shall perform such duties as assigned to him by the board. The director of experiments, with the approval of the board, shall:

Manage and control the experiment farms;

Manage, control and dispose of personal property used in connection with experiment farms and stations;

Employ practical and experienced dry farmers, irrigation farmers, horticulturists, persons skilled in animal husbandry and other agents and servants, who shall under his direction cultivate the farms, conduct experiments thereon, demonstrate the adaptability of various soils and climatic conditions for the production of different kinds of grain, grasses, vegetables, shade, ornamental and fruitbearing trees, vines and bushes that may profitably be grown in the varied locations of the farms of the state, and conduct such other experiments as advisable in animal husbandry.

The director of the experiments shall carefully record, preserve and compile the results of all experiments and demonstrations and report the results publicly on a regular basis.

The sale and disposition of all crops and livestock raised or produced upon experiment farms shall be made by the director of the Wyoming agricultural experiment station jointly with the director of experiments. Any money realized from sales in excess of the expense of conducting the farms shall be turned over to the treasury of the state.

Before purchasing any land for use in the agricultural experiment and research program at the University of Wyoming, the board of trustees shall determine the location of all lands owned by the state or any agency of the state and the use being made of such state lands. The board of trustees shall negotiate with the agency of the state responsible for the administration and control of such state lands to determine the feasibility of leasing such state lands for use in the agricultural experiment and research program providing the lands available are suitable to the purpose. Any state agency which owns or has responsibility for the administration and control of state lands shall negotiate with the University of Wyoming in leasing such lands, at the fair market value, provided the use of the land by the university is not inconsistent with the use for which the land is held by the state or agency.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 67, §§ 1, 2, 4, 5; C.S. 1920, §§ 3702, 3703, 3705, 3706; Laws 1931, ch. 73, §§ 53-55; R.S. 1931, §§ 5-401 to 5-404; C.S. 1945, §§ 70-201 to 70-204; W.S. 1957, §§ 21-357 to 21-360; Laws 1973, ch. 215, § 1; 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-2-301

; Laws 1982, ch. 30, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 207.

Cross references. —

As to operation of veterinary laboratory under agreement with university, see §

21-17-308

.

As to agriculture generally, see title 11.

As to commissioner of agriculture using university faculty members as deputies, see §

11-2-204

.

As to seed certification service of college of agriculture of university, see §

11-12-119

.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, rewrote (c), which formerly read: “The director of the experiments shall carefully record, preserve and compile the results of all experiments and demonstrations and, as required by W.S.

9-2-1014

, report to the governor. He shall further furnish information to the people of the state as to the results of demonstrations and experiments conducted.”

Purpose of act. —

Laws 1982, ch. 30, § 2, provides: “It is the intent of the legislature to promote multiple use of state lands for public purposes and to prevent the conversion of land from private ownership to public ownership to the extent possible. All state agencies are directed to administer state lands under their control to achieve maximum multiple use for state purposes.”

§ 21-17-302.
Location and acreage of farms; supervision and control.

The state may conduct experimental farms:

through (iv) Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 147, § 3.

At or near Sheridan, Sheridan county, Wyoming.

The board of trustees of the University of Wyoming and the department of family services shall conclude arrangements for agricultural experimental programs under their joint control to be conducted upon and in connection with farm property of the Wyoming boys’ school at Worland, Wyoming, using not less than eighty (80) and not more than one hundred (100) acres of ground on the premises. The arrangements shall include provision for an apartment in the buildings of the institute as living quarters for the superintendent of programs and for availability in the operations of labor from the institute’s committed personnel as selected by the superintendent of the institute and jointly controlled during their working hours by that superintendent and the superintendent of the experimental station.

The board of trustees of the University of Wyoming shall provide for the operation of a research station at Powell, Wyoming to conduct programs related to soils, vegetation diseases, fertilizers, insects, irrigation phases and other related factors, in order to effectuate reduction or elimination of causes detrimental to agriculture. The board of trustees of the university may also provide for the operation of a sustainable agricultural research and extension center in Goshen county, Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 133, §§ 1-5; 1915, ch. 21, §§ 1-5; ch. 98, §§ 1-5; 1919, ch. 123, §§ 1-6; C.S. 1920, §§ 3708 to 3711; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 57; R.S. 1931, § 5-406; C.S. 1945, § 70-209; Laws 1947, ch. 153, § 1; ch. 155, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 21-365 to 21-367; Laws 1973, ch. 215, § 1; 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-2-302

; Laws 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 2003, ch. 147, §§ 1, 3.

Contingent legislation. —

Laws 2003, ch. 147, § 2, provides:

“(a)

To enable orderly development of the sustainable agricultural research and extension center in Goshen county, Wyoming, as authorized by section 1 of this act, and to avoid disruption of ongoing research and service activities, the experimental farm in Goshen county authorized under the current W.S. 21-17-302(a)(ii) may continue in operation as long as necessary.

“(b)

The legislature finds that property at Archer, in Laramie County, is no longer suitable for use as an experiment station in view of the requirements of a modern agricultural experiment station.

“(c)

The price for any property purchased to be used for the sustainable agricultural research and extension center shall be negotiated based upon its fair market value. No negotiations for the purchase of any property shall be made prior to the completion of an independent analysis of the fair market value of the property by not less than two (2) independent appraisers excluding any appraisal provided by the seller. The appraisers shall be selected by the board of trustees of the University of Wyoming. The board shall negotiate any price for the facility based upon the independent appraisals. The board shall report to the joint appropriations interim committee not later than ninety (90) days following the purchase of any property pursuant to this section which report shall include the fair market value as indicated by the independent appraisals and the final negotiated price paid for the property.”

§ 21-17-303.
Appropriation of funds.

Revenue within the agricultural college account provided by W.S. 9-4-310(c)(i) is appropriated and may be used by the board of trustees of the University of Wyoming for any purpose connected with the supporting and maintenance of the agricultural college at the University of Wyoming not inconsistent or in conflict with any act of congress. The money shall be paid by the state treasurer to the treasurer of the board of trustees of the state university upon the warrant of the state auditor upon request of the board of trustees.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 42, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 433; C.S. 1920, § 489; R.S. 1931, § 108-524; C.S. 1945, § 70-121; W.S. 1957, § 21-369; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-2-303

.

Cited

in

State ex rel. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Snyder, 30 Wyo. 468, 222 P. 40,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(1924).

§ 21-17-304.
Acceptance of federal grants; administration.

The state of Wyoming assents to and accepts the conditions of the acts of the United States Congress cited as 7 U.S.C. sections 301 through 390j and 16 U.S.C. sections 590a through 590q-3, and future acts amendatory or supplemental thereto.

Except as otherwise provided by congress or the laws of Wyoming, all money authorized by subsection (a) of this section shall be received by the state treasurer and transferred to the board of trustees of the University of Wyoming. The trustees of the University of Wyoming shall annually appropriate and designate the uses of the money received under subsection (a) of this section which shall be in conformity with the terms of the grant.

The board of trustees of the University of Wyoming shall have prepared necessary reports and take other actions necessary to comply with the requirements of and obtain grants and administer programs pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. Agricultural extension work shall be carried on in connection with the college of agriculture of the university.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; W.S. 1957, §

21-2-304

.

Editor's notes. —

Several of the provisions of 7 U.S.C. §§ 301 through 390j, referred to in subsection (a), have been omitted or repealed.

Land grant fund. —

An institution, although established by the state for agricultural education, cannot compel payment of any part of interest on the land grant fund to it, disposition of which is wholly within power of the state acting through its legislature. Wyoming ex rel. Wyoming Agric. College v. Irvine, 206 U.S. 278, 27 S. Ct. 613, 51 L. Ed. 1063, 1907 U.S. LEXIS 1163 (U.S. 1907).

§ 21-17-305.
County cooperation in extension work; districts; county agents.

A board of county commissioners may cooperate in extension work in agriculture and home economics in the county under the supervision of the agricultural college of the university and for that purpose may annually appropriate and expend any amount the board deems expedient so long as this levy and all levies for general county government do not exceed the constitutional mill limit.

Any two (2) or more contiguous counties may unite in the formation of a district for the purposes of subsection (a) of this section. The district formed shall be regarded as a single county for the purposes of this section and is entitled to the same benefits as if the district were one (1) county. No county included in a district is entitled to any benefits of this section so long as the district receives benefits under this section.

Any county or district complying with this section upon request shall receive a county agent or agricultural expert to be provided by the agricultural college of the university. The university shall provide a suitable agent or expert, qualified to do the work usually expected from a person educated in the science of agriculture.

The university trustees may receive and expend money from any source under the supervision of the agricultural college for the purposes of this section.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 25, §§ 4-6; C.S. 1920, §§ 495-497; Laws 1929, ch. 60, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 108-602 to 108-605; C.S. 1945, §§ 70-306 to 70-309; W.S. 1957, §§ 21-380 to 21-382, 21-384; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-2-305

.

§ 21-17-306.
Soil conservation programs; state advisory board.

In formulating plans for soil conservation programs to be submitted to the secretary of agriculture the university shall select a state advisory board with the approval of the governor from persons who participate in soil conservation programs as recommended by committees of county associations of persons who participate in soil conservation programs. The director of the department of agriculture is an ex officio member of the state advisory board.

In implementing approved soil conservation program plans the university may:

Employ and designate such agencies as it deems necessary to cooperate with local and state agencies, agencies of other states and the federal government;

Provide for the conduct of research and educational activities;

Provide by voluntary methods for adjustments in the utilization of land and farming practices and for payment in connection therewith.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 81, §§ 4, 5, 7; C.S. 1945, §§ 70-404, 70-405, 70-407; W.S. 1957, §§ 21-389 to 21-390; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-2-306

; Laws 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

Severability. —

Laws 1937, ch. 81, § 8, provides: “That should any section of this act be declared void by the courts, such action shall not effect the remainder of said act.”

§ 21-17-307.
Leases authorized; scope of authority to lease.

The trustees of the University of Wyoming may grant mineral leases in the name of the state of Wyoming to any lands acquired in the name of the state of Wyoming for experimental farm purposes. This authority extends to those lands transferred into the control of the trustees of the University of Wyoming by chapter 99, Session Laws of Wyoming, 1923, and all other land theretofore or thereafter acquired in the name of the state of Wyoming for experimental farm purposes and now under the administration and control of the trustees of the University of Wyoming, whether or not acquired pursuant to express legislative authorization.

Mineral leases executed under the authority hereby granted shall be executed by such persons, shall be granted upon terms prescribed by the state board of land commissioners for the leasing of other state lands and shall include such additional provisions as the trustees of the University of Wyoming determine to be necessary to protect the surface of the lands or the use thereof for university purposes.

If land used for experimental farm purposes is leased under this section, and it becomes untenable for experimental purposes by virtue of mineral production or exploration thereon, the trustees shall, without unnecessary delay, obtain other lands in the same general vicinity. In all cases the land obtained, whether by grant, purchase or gift, must be within the boundaries of the same county as the land rendered untenable and must be suitable for experimental farm purposes. The trustees shall take immediate steps to reestablish an operating experimental farm on the land obtained.

All amounts received under mineral leases, including bonus payments, delay rentals and royalties, shall be expended for the purposes of the University of Wyoming as the trustees of the University of Wyoming may determine.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 96, §§ 1-4; W.S. 1957, §§ 21-384.1 to 21-384.4; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-2-307

.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1923, ch. 99, transferred the powers of the state board of horticulture and the agricultural advisory board to the board of trustees of the University of Wyoming.

§ 21-17-308.
Wyoming state veterinary laboratory.

The division of microbiology and veterinary medicine, college of agriculture, University of Wyoming shall manage, operate and maintain the Wyoming state veterinary laboratory. All records, property, personnel and unused funds of the Wyoming livestock board designated for the Wyoming state veterinary laboratory shall be transferred to the division of microbiology and veterinary medicine.

The Wyoming state veterinary laboratory shall:

Inquire into, maintain records of and prepare an annual report of the causes of contagious, infectious and communicable diseases found among livestock in this state; assist in the determination of means for the prevention and treatment of such diseases; and collect and disseminate information on these and other animal health related subjects valuable to the livestock interests of Wyoming;

Assist licensed veterinarians and the livestock industry in this state in making diagnoses at their request;

Assist licensed veterinarians in this state with proper collection and shipment of diagnostic materials; and

Otherwise provide services and consultation upon request of licensed veterinarians and the livestock industry in this state.

There is created a six (6) member advisory council hereafter known as the council. The council shall advise the division of microbiology and veterinary medicine on matters pertaining to the Wyoming state veterinary laboratory and other matters that pertain to animal health. Three (3) members of the council shall be appointed by the Wyoming board of veterinary medicine and three (3) members shall be appointed by the Wyoming livestock board. The head of the division of microbiology and veterinary medicine shall be an ex officio member of the council. Council members shall serve a term of three (3) years. The initial council shall constitute itself so that no more than two (2) members will be replaced each year. The council shall elect a chairman and secretary from its membership. The council shall meet at least semiannually and on other occasions as deemed necessary by the council. Authorized travel expenses of the council members shall be paid by the agency responsible for their appointment in the same manner and amount as provided by W.S.

9-3-102

.

The annual report of the council shall be prepared for the governor, Wyoming livestock board, Wyoming board of veterinary medicine, president of the University of Wyoming and such other individuals deemed necessary by the council. The cost of printing the annual report shall be borne by the budget of the Wyoming state veterinary laboratory.

All individual identifying client information in the records and information maintained or collected by the Wyoming state veterinary laboratory related to diagnosis of contagious, infectious, communicable, toxic and genetic diseases of individual animals or herds shall be confidential and shall not be released except to the individual submitting the sample for diagnosis unless:

Laboratory testing results in the recognition of a state or federally reportable disease;

It is in the best interests of animal or human public health, as determined by the director of the Wyoming state veterinary laboratory or his designee, to release the information; or

The release of the information is required by state or federal law. Nothing in this subsection shall affect the duty of the Wyoming state veterinary laboratory or any other person to report contagious or infectious diseases as required by state or federal law.

History.

Laws 1978, ch. 47, § 1; 2005, ch. 49, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to duties with regard to wildlife/livestock disease research partnership, see §

11-19-602

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added (e).